incubator/apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AÁBCČDĎEÉĚFGHIÍJKLMNŇOÓPQRŘSŠTŤUÚŮVWXYÝZŽaábcčdďeéěfghiíjklmnňoópqrřsštťuúůvwxyýzž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>

    <sdef n="ma"     c="mužský životný"/>
    <sdef n="mi"     c="mužský neživotný"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="ženský"/>
    <sdef n="nt"     c="střední"/>

    <sdef n="nom"    c="nominativ"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="genitiv"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="dativ"/>
    <sdef n="acc"    c="akuzativ"/>
    <sdef n="ins"    c="instrumentál"/>
    <sdef n="loc"    c="lokál"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="vokativ"/>

    <sdef n="sg"     c="singulár"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="plurál"/>

    <sdef n="pr"/>
    
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"  c="časování"/>
    <sdef n="imperf" c="nedokonavé"/>
    <sdef n="perf"   c="dokonavé"/>
    <sdef n="p1"     c="první osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="druhá osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="třetí osoba"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="přítomný čas"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="minulý čas"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="rozkazovací způsob"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="sí/h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hové</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hů</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hovi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hům</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hové</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hovi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zích</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hem</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kmet__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ů</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ům</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="boxe/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ři</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rů</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rovi</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rům</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ři</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rovi</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rech</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rem</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="síh"><i>sí</i><par n="sí/h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chlap"><i>chlap</i><par n="kmet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kmet"><i>kmet</i><par n="kmet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boxer"><i>boxe</i><par n="boxe/r__n"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
